Washington statutes.
RCW 5.44.130

Seal, how affixed.

A seal of court or public office, when required to any writ, process, or proceeding to authenticate a copy of any record or document, may be affixed by making an inked, printed, or embossed impression directly on the document and shall be considered valid.

[ 2006 c 198 s 1; Code 1881 s 434; 1877 p 95 s 436; 1869 p 116 s 430; 1854 p 196 s 338; RRS s 1258.]

NOTES:

Private seals abolished: RCW 64.04.090.

Seals of courts and municipalities: State Constitution Art. 27 s 9.

Superior court seal: RCW 2.08.050.

Supreme court seal: Rules of court: SAR 1.

Telegraphic message, description of seal: RCW 5.52.060.